Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1911
Prior lien; validity.

No action on any petition filed in accordance with section 76-1906 nor any order of confirmation entered thereon shall at any time affect or impair any prior lien upon agricultural land under any mortgage or trust deed executed or judgment rendered prior to November 21, 1986, and no redemptive right created by the Farm Homestead Protection Act shall exist with respect to any such mortgage, trust deed, or judgment.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 11.